District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

2-308.18

Remedies pursuant to other laws; severability of provisions; liberality of article construction.

Recodified as § 2-381.06.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 818, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687